dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- भोटाहिटी; भोटाहिटी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोटाहिटी__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देवी; देवी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देवी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोभियत; सोभियत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सोभियत__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झिल्के; झिल्के; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झिल्के__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रवि; रवि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रवि__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तानसेन; तानसेन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तानसेन__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोविन्द; गोविन्द; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोविन्द__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रोम; रोम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रोम__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विरुवा; विरुवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विरुवा__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खनाल; खनाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खनाल__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पशुपतिनाथ; पशुपतिनाथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पशुपतिनाथ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आसाम; आसाम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आसाम__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रजापति; प्रजापति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रजापति__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विक्रम; विक्रम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विक्रम__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रोशन; रोशन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रोशन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भवानी; भवानी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भवानी__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चौधरी; चौधरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चौधरी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शर्मा; शर्मा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शर्मा__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भीमसेन; भीमसेन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भीमसेन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शिव; शिव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शिव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गौतम; गौतम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गौतम__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इन्द्र; इन्द्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इन्द्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रसाद; प्रसाद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रसाद__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महाभारत; महाभारत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महाभारत__np_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- श्याम; श्याम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="श्याम__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- असीमज्यू; असीमज्यू; 1 -->
    <pardef n="असीमज्यू__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मालती; मालती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मालती__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सेती; सेती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सेती__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सार्क; सार्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सार्क__np_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कैलाश; कैलाश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कैलाश__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देउवा; देउवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देउवा__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पिताम्बर; पिताम्बर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पिताम्बर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फ्रान्स; फ्रान्स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फ्रान्स__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बनारस; बनारस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बनारस__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिन्धु; सिन्धु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिन्धु__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लसएन्जिल्स; लसएन्जिल्स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लसएन्जिल्स__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भरत; भरत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भरत__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="भोटाहिटी"><i>भोटाहिटी</i><par n="भोटाहिटी__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="देवी"><i>देवी</i><par n="देवी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सोभियत"><i>सोभियत</i><par n="सोभियत__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="झिल्के"><i>झिल्के</i><par n="झिल्के__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रवि"><i>रवि</i><par n="रवि__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="तानसेन"><i>तानसेन</i><par n="तानसेन__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="गोविन्द"><i>गोविन्द</i><par n="गोविन्द__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रोम"><i>रोम</i><par n="रोम__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="विरुवा"><i>विरुवा</i><par n="विरुवा__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="खनाल"><i>खनाल</i><par n="खनाल__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पशुपतिनाथ"><i>पशुपतिनाथ</i><par n="पशुपतिनाथ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="आसाम"><i>आसाम</i><par n="आसाम__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रजापति"><i>प्रजापति</i><par n="प्रजापति__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="विक्रम"><i>विक्रम</i><par n="विक्रम__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रोशन"><i>रोशन</i><par n="रोशन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भवानी"><i>भवानी</i><par n="भवानी__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="चौधरी"><i>चौधरी</i><par n="चौधरी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शर्मा"><i>शर्मा</i><par n="शर्मा__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भीमसेन"><i>भीमसेन</i><par n="भीमसेन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शिव"><i>शिव</i><par n="शिव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गौतम"><i>गौतम</i><par n="गौतम__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="इन्द्र"><i>इन्द्र</i><par n="इन्द्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रसाद"><i>प्रसाद</i><par n="प्रसाद__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="महाभारत"><i>महाभारत</i><par n="महाभारत__np_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="श्याम"><i>श्याम</i><par n="श्याम__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="असीमज्यू"><i>असीमज्यू</i><par n="असीमज्यू__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मालती"><i>मालती</i><par n="मालती__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सेती"><i>सेती</i><par n="सेती__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="सार्क"><i>सार्क</i><par n="सार्क__np_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कैलाश"><i>कैलाश</i><par n="कैलाश__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="देउवा"><i>देउवा</i><par n="देउवा__np"/></e>
    <e lm="पिताम्बर"><i>पिताम्बर</i><par n="पिताम्बर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="फ्रान्स"><i>फ्रान्स</i><par n="फ्रान्स__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="बनारस"><i>बनारस</i><par n="बनारस__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="सिन्धु"><i>सिन्धु</i><par n="सिन्धु__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="लसएन्जिल्स"><i>लसएन्जिल्स</i><par n="लसएन्जिल्स__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="भरत"><i>भरत</i><par n="भरत__np_m_aa"/></e>
